Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1
APPLICABILITY

17-22.5-101. One continuous sentence.

For the purposes of this article, when any inmate has been committed under several convictions with separate sentences, the department shall construe all sentences as one continuous sentence.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 517, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-102. Custody of department.

When any person is sentenced to any correctional facility, that person shall be deemed to be in the custody of the executive director or his designee and shall begin serving his sentence on the date of sentencing.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 517, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-102.5. Purpose of parole.

The purposes of this article with respect to parole are:

To further all purposes of sentencing and improve public safety by reducing the incidence of crime and technical parole violations committed by people on parole;

To prepare, select, and assist people who, after serving a statutorily defined period of incarceration, will be transitioned and returned to the community;

To set individualized conditions of parole and to provide supervision services and support to assist people on parole in addressing identified risks and needs; and

To achieve a successful discharge from parole supervision for people on parole through compliance with the terms and conditions of release that address their risks and needs.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 648, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1215), ch.120, p. 341, § 1, effective August 10.

17-22.5-103. Computation of time.

No inmate shall be discharged from the department until he has remained the full term for which he was sentenced, to be computed on and after the day on which he was received into the same and excluding any time the inmate may have been at large by reason of escape therefrom, unless he is pardoned or otherwise released by legal authority.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 517, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-104. Parole - regulations.

Any inmate in the custody of the department may be allowed to go on parole in accordance with section 17-22.5-403, subject to the provisions and conditions contained in this article and article 2 of this title.

No inmate imprisoned under a life sentence for a crime committed before July 1, 1977, shall be paroled until such inmate has served at least ten calendar years, and no application for parole shall be made or considered during such period of ten years.

No inmate imprisoned under a life sentence for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1977, but before July 1, 1985, shall be paroled until such inmate has served at least twenty calendar years, and no application for parole shall be made or considered during such period of twenty years.

Except as described in section 18-1.3-401 (4)(c), C.R.S., and in subparagraphs (IV) and (V) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (2), no inmate imprisoned under a life sentence for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1985, shall be paroled until such inmate has served at least forty calendar years, and no application for parole shall be made or considered during such period of forty years.

Subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) does not apply to an inmate sentenced pursuant to section 16-13-101 (2), C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 1993, for any crime committed on or after July 1, 1985, and the inmate shall be eligible for parole after the inmate has served forty calendar years less any time authorized pursuant to section 17-22.5-405.

No inmate imprisoned under a life sentence for a class 1 felony committed on or after July 1, 1990, shall be eligible for parole.

This paragraph (d) shall not apply to any inmate sentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-801 (2), C.R.S., for any crime committed on or after July 1, 1993, and any such inmate shall be eligible for parole in accordance with section 17-22.5-403.

No inmate imprisoned under a life sentence pursuant to section 18-1.3-801 (2.5), C.R.S., and no inmate imprisoned under a life sentence pursuant to section 18-1.3-801 (1), C.R.S., on and after July 1, 1994, for a crime committed on and after that date, shall be paroled until such inmate has served at least forty calendar years, and no application for parole shall be made or considered during such period of forty years.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(d)(I) of this section, an inmate imprisoned to a life sentence for a class 1 felony committed before July 1, 1990, or on or after July 1, 2006, who was convicted as an adult following direct filing of an information or indictment in the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-801 or transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, may be eligible for parole after the inmate has served at least forty years, less any earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405. An application for parole may not be made or considered during this period.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(d)(I) of this section, an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment for a class 1 felony committed on or after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2006, who was convicted as an adult following direct filing of an information or indictment in the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-801, or transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, or pursuant to either of these sections as they existed prior to their repeal and reenactment, with amendments, by House Bill 96-1005, may be eligible for parole after serving forty years, less any earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 518, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(b) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 648, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(b) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 657, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) added, p. 654, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 954, § 24, effective July 1; (2)(d) added, p. 928, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(d) amended, p. 404, § 4, effective June 6.

L. 93:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1977, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2)(d)(III) amended, p. 1472, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(2)(d)(II) and (2)(d)(III) amended, p. 1501, § 162, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(d)(IV) added, p. 1052, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 2015:

(2)(c) and (2)(d)(I) amended, (HB 15-1203), ch. 154, p. 461, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2)(c)(I) and (2)(d)(IV) amended and (2)(d)(V) added, (SB 16-181), ch. 353, p. 1449, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 2021:

(2)(d)(IV) and (2)(d)(V) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 716, § 33, effective October 1.

17-22.5-105. Applicability of part.

The provisions of this part 1 shall apply to all offenders sentenced to the department.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 518, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-106. Right to attend parole hearings - right to notification of parole hearings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 503, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 644, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 2598, § 10, effective June 3.

17-22.5-107. Administrative release and revocation guidelines - creation.

The division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, in consultation with the state board of parole, shall develop an administrative release guideline instrument for use by the board in evaluating applications for parole.

The administrative release guideline instrument shall be used to provide the state board of parole with consistent and comprehensive information relevant to the factors listed in section 17-22.5-404 (4)(a). The instrument shall include a matrix of advisory-release-decision recommendations for the different risk levels.

The department of corrections, in consultation with the state board of parole, shall develop administrative revocation guidelines for use by the board in evaluating complaints filed for parole revocation.

The administrative revocation guidelines shall be used to provide the state board of parole with consistent and comprehensive information based on the factors identified in section 17-22.5-404 (5)(a). The guidelines shall include a matrix of advisory-decision recommendations for the different risk levels.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1374), ch. 261, p. 1180, § 3, effective May 25.